New Jersey, session 221, A853.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a public institution of higher education shall not increase the tuition of a resident undergraduate student for four continuous academic years following the student's initial enrollment in the institution or, in the case of a student enrolled in an undergraduate program regularly requiring more than four academic years to complete, for the number of academic years required for completion. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to students who initially enroll in public institutions of higher education in the academic year next following the date of enactment.